Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 5. Finance.

§ 50-73.32.
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 94.1.

§ 50-73.33.
Liability for contribution.

A promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the limited partner or his duly authorized attorney-in-fact.
A. 1. A promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the limited partner or his duly authorized attorney-in-fact.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated to the limited partnership to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if he is unable to perform because of death, disability or any other reason. If a partner does not make the required contribution of property or services, he is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to §

50-73.8

, of the stated contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all the partners. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited partnership who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on that obligation after the partner signs a writing that reflects the obligation and before the amendment or cancellation thereof to reflect the compromise, may enforce the original obligation.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.34.
Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide in writing, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to §

50-73.8

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.

§ 50-73.35.
Sharing of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide in writing, distributions shall be made on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to §

50-73.8

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702.